Massachusetts, session 194th, H2882.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32, Section 3(2)(g) is hereby amended by adding the following at the beginning
of Group 2. Employees of the Commonwealth who are required to respond to emergencies or
work in hazardous environments; employees of the Commonwealth who are required to respond
and inspect hazardous material spills or who are required to inspect such areas or whose duties
require one to be present where such hazardous materials, including asbestos and radioactive
materials, are stored, used, emitted, and or manufactured or where contamination from such has
occurred; employees of the Commonwealth who work in laboratories handling biological or
other dangerous materials associated with blood-born, viral or other possible communicable
and/or dangerous substances; employees of the Commonwealth whose duties include the use of
scuba diving equipment or work as aerial foresters or crewmen. State Employees who engage in
homeland security duties, MEMA and emergency response actions associated with public safety,
environmental protection and public health.
of 1